Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2001
Inheritance tax; property taxable; transfer by will or inheritance; exception.

All property, including proceeds of life insurance receivable by the executor or administrator to the extent of the amount receivable by the executor or administrator as insurance under policies upon the life of the decedent, which shall pass by will or by the intestate laws of this state from any person who, at the time of death was a resident of this state, or, if the decedent was not a resident, any part of the property within this state, except property exempted by the provisions of Chapter 77, article 20, shall be subject to tax at the rates prescribed by sections 77-2004 to 77-2006.

Laws 1901, c. 54, § 1, p. 414;

Laws 1905, c. 117, § 1, p. 523;

Laws 1907, c. 103, § 1, p. 356;

R.S.1913, § 6622;

C.S.1922, § 6153;

Laws 1923, c. 187, § 1, p. 430;

C.S.1929, § 77-2201;

Laws 1931, c. 132, § 1, p. 371;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2201;

R.S.1943, § 77-2001;

Laws 1945, c. 198, § 3, p. 604;

Laws 1951, c. 267, § 1, p. 898;

Laws 1982, LB 480, § 1.

Inheritance taxes are imposed on each beneficiary upon the value of property received by him while estate taxes are upon the right to transmit property and are based upon the whole estate transmitted. Nielsen v. Sidner, 191 Neb. 324, 215 N.W.2d 86 (1974).

To authorize imposition of tax, decedent must have interest in property at time of his death. County of Holt v. Gallagher, 156 Neb. 457, 56 N.W.2d 621 (1953).

A foreign corporation organized exclusively for charitable purposes, although it has domesticated in this state, is not exempt from payment of inheritance tax. In re Estate of Sautter, 142 Neb. 42, 5 N.W.2d 263 (1942).

Property escheating to state is not subject to inheritance tax. In re Estate of O'Connor, 126 Neb. 182, 252 N.W. 826 (1934).

Where property passes by will, it is subject to an inheritance tax even though the devise or bequest was made with the intention of carrying out a previous contract. Krug v. Douglas County, 114 Neb. 517, 208 N.W. 665 (1926).

Legacy to religious institution and to trustees of state cemetery is subject to inheritance tax. In re Rudge's Estate, 114 Neb. 335, 207 N.W. 520 (1926).

Legislature has power to provide for taxation upon inheritance. In re Sanford, 90 Neb. 410, 133 N.W. 870 (1911); State ex rel. Slabaugh v. Vinsonhaler, 74 Neb. 675, 105 N.W. 472 (1905).

Right to succeed to title to mortgage on Nebraska land, payable to nonresident of state, is not subject to tax. Dodge County v. Burns, 89 Neb. 534, 131 N.W. 922 (1911).

Where stocks were held by foreign trustee in trust for resident of this state, property was subject to inheritance tax. Douglas County v. Kountze, 84 Neb. 506, 121 N.W. 593 (1909).

Inheritance tax is not a property tax but a tax upon the right of succession. State ex rel. Slabaugh v. Vinsonhaler, 74 Neb. 675, 105 N.W. 472 (1905).